South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5325.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 29 God of Abraham, Issac, and Jacob Section 1-1-1810.  The State of South Carolina affirms that the God of Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob is the only true Creator God recognized by this State or political subdivision thereof, including school districts. This recognition is based on the historical and foundational principles referenced in the Declaration of Independence, United States Constitution, and Constitution of this State. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----